Maine, session 132, LD1692.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11152, sub-§8-A is enacted to read:
8-A. Agricultural landowner antlerless deer permits. A landowner that qualifies
to hunt without a license pursuant to section 11108, subsection 1 and that applies for the
antlerless deer permit lottery adopted by the commissioner pursuant to subsection 3 may
be issued one antlerless deer permit at no cost. The landowner may apply for an additional
antlerless deer permit through the antlerless deer permit lottery and pay the fee under
subsection 9.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.